New York, session 2025-2026, S10008.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 27 of section 32 of the public health law is 2 renumbered subdivision 28 and a new subdivision 27 is added to read as 3 follows: 4 27. to examine the licensed home care services agencies cost reports 5 and report back to the legislature by December first, two thousand twen- 6 ty-seven. Such examination shall include an analysis of all costs 7 including wages paid, general overhead, training, technology, human 8 resources and other administrative costs and any margin. Such analysis 9 shall also include a comparison by region and provider type; and 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14823-03-6